North Carolina statutes. Chapter 113. Conservation and Development.
Article 22. Regulation of Wildlife.
§ 113-291.4A.
Open seasons for taking foxes with firearms.

There is an open season for the taking of foxes with firearms in all areas of the State east of Interstate Highway 77 and in Mitchell and Caldwell Counties from the beginning of the season established by the Wildlife Resources Commission for the taking of rabbits and quail through January 1 of each year. The selling, buying, or possessing for sale of any fox or fox part taken pursuant to this subsection is prohibited, and is punishable as provided by G.S. 113-294(a) or (j).

The Wildlife Resources Commission shall establish appropriate bag and season limits that may be imposed upon the taking of foxes pursuant to this section, and may make reasonable rules governing the possession of foxes killed by motor vehicles or other accidental means.

History.

1989, c. 616, s. 1; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 811; 1995, c. 32, s. 1; 1999-456, s. 32; 2017-102, s. 41.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-102, s. 41, effective July 12, 2017, substituted “section” for “act” in subsection (b).

§ 113-291.4B.
Taking foxes and coyotes in certain counties.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, there is an open season for taking foxes with weapons and for foxes and coyotes by trapping during the trapping season set by the Wildlife Resources Commission each year, with no tagging requirements prior to or after sale.

No bag limit applies to coyotes and foxes taken under this section.

This section applies only to Cabarrus, Caldwell, Cleveland, Cumberland, Gaston, McDowell, Mitchell, Montgomery, Rowan, Rutherford, Stokes, and Yancey Counties.

History.

2019-107, s. 2.

§ 113-291.5.
Regulation of dogs used in hunting; limitations on authority of Wildlife Resources Commission; control of dogs on game lands; control of dogs chasing deer; other restrictions.

Except as provided in

G.S. 113-291.4

, in the area described below, the Wildlife Resources Commission may regulate the use of dogs taking wildlife with respect to seasons, times, and places of use. The area covered by this subsection is that part of the State in and west of the following counties or parts of counties: Rockingham; Guilford; that part of Alamance and Orange lying south of Interstate Highway 85; Chatham; that part of Wake lying south of N.C. Highway 98; Lee; Randolph; Montgomery; Stanly; Union; and that part of Anson lying west of N.C. Highway 742.

In the area of the State lying east of that described in subsection (a), the Wildlife Resources Commission may not restrict or prohibit the use of dogs in hunting or the training of dogs, in season or out, except during the breeding and raising seasons for game during the period April 15 through June 15.

On game lands, wildlife refuges, and public hunting grounds the Wildlife Resources Commission may regulate the possession and use of dogs and may impound dogs found running at large without supervision or, if unsupervised, without means of identification.

The Wildlife Resources Commission may not by its rules anywhere in the State restrict the number of dogs used in hunting or require that any particular breed of dog be used in hunting.

It is unlawful to allow dogs not under the control of the owner or the individual in possession of the dogs to run or chase deer during the closed deer season.

Nothing in this section is intended to require the leashing or confining of pet dogs.

History.

1979, c. 830, s. 1; 1987, c. 827, s. 98.

§ 113-291.5A.
Exemption from civil liability for landholder permitting retrieval of hunting dogs.

It is the intent of the General Assembly to recognize that hunting with dogs is a valuable part of the outdoor heritage of the State of North Carolina, and it is further the intent of the General Assembly to encourage cooperative and neighborly agreements between landowners and hunters to allow legal retrieval of hunting dogs.

Any person, as an owner, lessee, occupant, or otherwise in control of land, who gives permission to a hunter to enter upon the land for the purpose of retrieving hunting dogs that have strayed onto the land owes that hunter the same duty of care the person owes a trespasser.

History.

2015-144, s. 8.

§ 113-291.6.
Regulation of trapping.

No one may take wild animals by trapping upon the land of another without having in his possession written permission issued and dated within the previous year by the owner of the land or his agent. This subsection does not apply to public lands on which trapping is not specifically prohibited, including tidelands, marshlands, and any other untitled land.

No one may take wild animals by trapping with any steel-jaw, leghold, or conibear trap unless it:

Has a jaw spread of not more than seven and one-half inches.

Is horizontally offset with closed jaw spread of at least three sixteenths of an inch for a trap with a jaw spread of more than five and one-half inches. This subdivision does not apply if the trap is set in the water with quick-drown type of set.

Is smooth edged and without teeth or spikes.

Has a weather-resistant permanent tag attached legibly giving the trapper’s name and address or the trapper’s trapper identification number provided by the Wildlife Resources Commission and the Wildlife Resources Commission’s telephone number to report wildlife violations. If a trapper places a trap on the property of another that gives the trapper’s trapper identification number instead of the trapper’s name and address, the Wildlife Resources Commission shall disclose the identity of the trapper to the landowner upon the landowner’s request.

A steel-jaw or leghold trap set on dry land with solid anchor may not have a trap chain longer than eight inches from trap to anchor unless fitted with a shock-absorbing device approved by the Wildlife Resources Commission.

No person may set or otherwise use a trap so that animals or birds when caught will be suspended. No hook of any type may be used to take wild animals or wild birds by trapping.

Conibear type traps that have an inside jaw spread or opening (width or height) greater than seven and one-half inches and no larger than 26 inches in width and 12 inches in height may only be set in the water and in areas in which beaver and otter may be lawfully trapped. For the purposes of this section:

A water-set trap is one totally covered by water with the anchor secured in water deep enough to drown the animal trapped quickly.

In areas of tidal waters, the mean high water is considered covering water.

In reservoir areas, covering water is the low water level prevailing during the preceding 24 hours.

Marshland, as defined in G.S. 113-229(n)(3), is not considered dry land.

With respect to any lawfully placed trap of another set in compliance with the provisions of this section, no one without the express permission of the trapper may:

Remove or disturb any trap; or

Remove any fur-bearing animal from the trap.

This subsection does not apply to wildlife protectors or other law-enforcement officers acting in the performance of their duties.

Nothing in this section prohibits the use of steel- or metal-jaw traps by county or State public health officials or their agents to control the spread of disease when the use of these traps has been declared necessary by the State Health Director.

The Wildlife Resources Commission must include the trapping requirements of this section in its annual digest of hunting and trapping rules provided to each person upon purchase of a license.

A person who has been issued a depredation permit for coyotes under G.S. 113-274(c) may use a Collarum m trap, or similar trap approved by the Wildlife Resources Commission, solely for the purpose of taking coyotes under that permit. The person authorized to use these traps pursuant to this subsection shall provide information on the effectiveness and efficiency of the traps as requested by the Commission. To minimize the risk of harm to nontargeted species, any such trap set shall be attended daily and any nontarget animal caught released.

History.

1977, c. 933, ss. 2, 7; 1979, c. 830, s. 1; 1981, c. 729; 1987, c. 827, s. 98; 1989, c. 727, s. 114; 1997-418, s. 5; 2009-120, s. 1; 2010-156, s. 1; 2019-204, s. 7.

Local Modification.

Camden: 1981, c. 436.

Cross References.

For the Beaver Damage Control Advisory Board, see

G.S. 113-291.10

.

For Taking Foxes and Coyotes in Certain Counties, see

G.S. 113-291.4

B.

§ 113-291.7.
Regulation of bears; limited retention of local acts closing bear seasons.

Local acts closing the season on bears are exempted from the provisions of G.S. 113-133.1(b) until July 1, 1981. After that date any local acts setting a year-round closed season on bears which have not by their terms expired are temporarily retained until the Wildlife Resources Commission supersedes them by adopting rules either opening a season in the county affected or carrying forward the closed-season provision.

Any rule adopted by the Wildlife Resources Commission that regulates the taking of female bears with cubs or that regulates the taking or possession of cub bears shall define cub bears as bears weighing less than 75 pounds.

Any hunter who has harvested a black bear (Ursus americanus) shall submit at least one premolar tooth to the Wildlife Resources Commission no later than January 31 following the applicable prior bear hunting season. The tooth submission shall include all of the following information on a form specified by the Wildlife Resources Commission:

The hunter’s name and mailing address.

The hunter’s Wildlife Resources Commission customer number and bear harvest authorization number.

The sex of the harvested bear.

The county of harvest.

Violation of subsection (c) of this section shall be an infraction as provided in

G.S. 14-3.1

, punishable by a fine of thirty-five dollars ($35.00). A person responsible for an infraction under this subsection shall not be assessed court costs, but the Executive Director of the North Carolina Wildlife Resources Commission is authorized to revoke or refuse to issue bear e-stamp privileges for any individual guilty of an infraction for violations of subsection (c) of this section for two consecutive years or upon failure to pay outstanding infraction fines when required to do so.

History.

1979, c. 830, s. 1; 1987, c. 827, s. 98; 2015-144, s. 6; 2021-160, s. 2(a).

§ 113-291.8.
Requirement to display hunter orange.

Any person hunting game animals other than foxes, bobcats, raccoons, and opossum, or hunting upland game birds other than wild turkeys, or hunting feral swine, with the use of firearms, must wear a cap or hat on his head made of hunter orange material or an outer garment of hunter orange visible from all sides. Any person hunting deer during a deer firearms season shall wear hunter orange. Hunter orange material is a material that is a daylight fluorescent orange color.This section does not apply to a landholder, his spouse, or children, who are hunting on land held by the landholder. This subsection shall be enforced by warning ticket only until October 1, 1992, with respect to those hunting rabbit, squirrel, grouse, pheasant, and quail.

Any person violating this section during the 1987 big game hunting season shall be given a warning of violation only. Thereafter, any person violating this section has committed an infraction and shall pay a fine of twenty-five dollars ($25.00). An infraction is an unlawful act that is not a crime. The procedure for charging and trying an infraction is the same as for a misdemeanor, but conviction of an infraction has no consequence other than payment of a fine. A person convicted of an infraction may not be assessed court costs.Wildlife Enforcement Officers are authorized to charge persons with the infraction created by this section.

Failure to wear hunter orange material in violation of this section shall not constitute negligence per se or contributory negligence per se.

History.

1987, c. 72, s. 1; 1991, c. 71, s. 1; 2007-401, s. 4; 2011-369, s. 5.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-401, s. 4, effective October 1, 2007, and applicable to acts committed on or after that date, added the second sentence in subsection (a).

Session Laws 2011-369, s. 5, effective October 1, 2011, and applicable to acts that occur on or after that date, inserted “or hunting feral swine” in the first sentence of the first paragraph in subsection (a).

§ 113-291.9.
Taking of beaver.

Notwithstanding any other law, there is an open season for taking beaver with firearms or bow and arrow during any open season for the taking of wild animals, provided that permission has been obtained from the owner or lessee of the land on which the beaver is being taken.

Notwithstanding any other law, it is lawful to use or sell beaver parts taken under a depredation permit issued by the Wildlife Resources Commission.

Notwithstanding G.S. 113-291.6(d) or any other law, it is lawful to set traps of the conibear type that have an inside jaw spread or opening (width or height) no larger than 26 inches in width and 12 inches in height if at least one-half of the trap is covered by water, when trapping beaver during the season for trapping beaver as established by the Wildlife Resources Commission.

Notwithstanding G.S. 113-291.1(b)(2) or any other law, it is lawful to use snares when trapping beaver during the season for trapping beaver as established by the Wildlife Resources Commission.

Repealed by Session Laws 1993, c. 33, s. 1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, landowners whose property is or has been damaged or destroyed by beaver may take beaver on their property by any lawful method without obtaining a depredation permit from the Wildlife Resources Commission, and may obtain assistance from other persons in taking the depredating beaver by giving those persons permission to take beaver on the landowner’s property.

Repealed by Session Laws 1997-456, s. 53.

History.

1991, c. 483, s. 3; 1993, c. 33, s. 1; 1995, c. 509, s. 56; 1997-97, s. 1; 1997-456, s. 53; 2007-401, s. 2; 2009-120, s. 2.

§ 113-291.10.
Beaver Damage Control Advisory Board.

There is established the Beaver Damage Control Advisory Board. The Board shall consist of nine members, as follows:

The Executive Director of the North Carolina Wildlife Resources Commission, or his designee, who shall serve as chair;

The Commissioner of Agriculture, or a designee;

The Assistant Commissioner of the North Carolina Forest Service of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, or a designee;

The Director of the Division of Soil and Water Conservation of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, or a designee;

A representative of the North Carolina Association of County Commissioners;

The Secretary of Transportation, or a designee;

The State Director of the Wildlife Services Division of the Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service, U.S. Department of Agriculture, or a designee;

The President of the North Carolina Farm Bureau Federation, Inc., or a designee, representing private landowners; and

A representative of the North Carolina Forestry Association.

The Beaver Damage Control Advisory Board shall develop a statewide program to control beaver damage on private and public lands. The Beaver Damage Control Advisory Board shall act in an advisory capacity to the Wildlife Resources Commission in the implementation of the program. In developing the program, the Board shall:

Orient the program primarily toward public health and safety and toward landowner assistance, providing some relief to landowners through beaver control and management rather than eradication;

Develop a priority system for responding to complaints about beaver damage;

Develop a system for documenting all activities associated with beaver damage control, so as to facilitate evaluation of the program;

Provide educational activities as a part of the program, such as printed materials, on-site instructions, and local workshops; and

Provide for the hiring of personnel necessary to implement beaver damage control activities, administer the program, and set salaries of personnel.No later than December 1 of each year, the Board shall issue a report to the Wildlife Resources Commission, the Senate and House Appropriations Subcommittees on Natural and Economic Resources, and the Fiscal Research Division on the results of the program during the preceding year.

The Wildlife Resources Commission shall implement the program, and may enter a cooperative agreement with the Wildlife Services Division of the Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service, United States Department of Agriculture, to accomplish the program.

Notwithstanding G.S. 113-291.6(d) or any other law, it is lawful to use snares when trapping beaver pursuant to the beaver damage control program developed pursuant to this section. The provisions of Chapter 218 of the 1975 Session Laws; Chapter 492 of the 1951 Session Laws, as amended by Chapter 506 of the 1955 Session Laws; and Chapter 1011 of the 1983 Session Laws do not apply to trapping carried out in implementing the beaver damage control program developed pursuant to this section.

In case of any conflict between G.S. 113-291.6(a) and G.S. 113-291.6(b) and this section, this section prevails.

Each county that wishes to participate in this program for a given State fiscal year shall provide written notification of its wish to participate no later than May 1 of the preceding fiscal year and shall remit the sum of six thousand dollars ($6,000) in local funds no later than July 31 of the fiscal year for which enrollment is sought. Funds, as appropriated for this program each fiscal year of the biennium, shall be paid from funds available to the Wildlife Resources Commission to provide the State share necessary to support this program, provided the sum of at least twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) in federal funds is available each fiscal year of the biennium to provide the federal share.

History.

1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1044, s. 69; 1993, c. 561, s. 111; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 769, s. 27.3; 1995, c. 358, s. 7; c. 437, s. 5; c. 467, s.4; c. 507, s. 26.6; 1996 Second Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 27.15; 1997-256, s. 10; 1997-347, s. 6; 1997-401, s. 6; 1997-418, s. 5; 1997-443, c. 15.44; 1998-23, s. 16; 1998-212, s. 14.18(a)-(c), (e); 1999-237, s. 15.1(b), (c); 2005-386, s. 1.7; 2007-484, s. 13; 2009-451, s. 13.10; 2011-145, ss. 13.22A(bb), 13.25(rr), 13.29; 2013-155, s. 18; 2019-204, s. 9.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-386, s. 1.7, effective September 13, 2005, substituted “Division of Soil and Water Conservation” for “Soil and Water Conservation Division” in subdivision (a)(4).

Session Laws 2007-484, s. 13, effective August 30, 2007, deleted “and Consumer Services” following “Commissioner of Agriculture” in subdivision (a)(2).

Session Laws 2009-451, s. 13.10, effective July 1, 2009, added the last sentence of subsection (f).

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.22A(bb), effective July 1, 2011, substituted “Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services” for “Department of Environment and Natural Resources” in subdivision (a)(4).

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.25(rr), effective July 1, 2011, substituted “Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services” for “Department of Environment and Natural Resources” in subdivision (a)(3).

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.29, effective July 1, 2011, substituted “Funds, as appropriated for this program each fiscal year of the biennium, shall be paid” for “At least three hundred forty-nine thousand dollars ($349,000) each fiscal year of the biennium shall be paid” in the last sentence of subsection (f).

Session Laws 2013-155, s. 18, effective July 1, 2013, substituted “Assistant Commissioner of the North Carolina Forest Service” for “Director of the Division of Forest Resources” in subdivision (a)(3).

Session Laws 2019-204, s. 9, effective January 1, 2020, rewrote subdivision (a)(5), which formerly read: “The Director of the North Carolina Cooperative Extension Service, or a designee”; substituted “December 1” for “March 15” in the ending undesignated paragraph of subdivision (b)(5); and rewrote the first sentence of subsection (f), which formerly read: “Each county that volunteers to participate in this program for a given fiscal year shall provide written notification of its wish to participate no later than September 30 of that year and shall commit the sum of four thousand dollars ($4,000) in local funds no later than September 30 of that year.”

§ 113-291.11.
Feeding of alligators prohibited.

It is unlawful to intentionally feed alligators outside of captivity.

History.

2007-401, s. 5.

§ 113-291.12.
Unlawful to remove live feral swine from traps.

It is unlawful to remove feral swine from a trap while the swine is still alive or to transport the live swine after that removal.

History.

2011-369, s. 6(a).

§ 113-291.13.
Application of wildlife laws to opossums.

No State or local statutes, rules, regulations, or ordinances related to the capture, captivity, treatment, or release of wildlife shall apply to the Virginia opossum
(Didelphis virginiana)
between the dates of December 29 of each year and January 2 of each subsequent year.

History.

2015-73, s. 1.

§ 113-292.
Authority of the Wildlife Resources Commission in regulation of inland fishing and the introduction of exotic species.

The Wildlife Resources Commission is authorized to authorize, license, regulate, prohibit, prescribe, or restrict all fishing in inland fishing waters, and the taking of inland game fish in coastal fishing waters, with respect to:

Time, place, character, or dimensions of any methods or equipment that may be employed in taking fish;

Seasons for taking fish;

Size limits on and maximum quantities of fish that may be taken, possessed, bailed to another, transported, bought, sold, or given away.

The Wildlife Resources Commission is authorized to authorize, license, regulate, prohibit, prescribe, or restrict:

The opening and closing of inland fishing waters, whether entirely or only as to the taking of particular classes of fish, use of particular equipment, or as to other activities within the jurisdiction of the Wildlife Resources Commission; and

The possession, cultivation, transportation, importation, exportation, sale, purchase, acquisition, and disposition of all inland fisheries resources and all related equipment, implements, vessels, and conveyances as necessary to implement the work of the Wildlife Resources Commission in carrying out its duties.To the extent not in conflict with provisions enforced by the Department, the Wildlife Resources Commission may exercise the powers conferred in this subsection in coastal fishing waters pursuant to its rule of inland game fish in such waters.

The Wildlife Resources Commission is authorized to make such rules pertaining to the acquisition, disposition, transportation, and possession of fish in connection with private ponds as may be necessary in carrying out the provisions of this Subchapter and the overall objectives of the conservation of wildlife resources.

(c1)

The Wildlife Resources Commission is authorized to issue proclamations suspending or extending the hook-and-line season for striped bass in the inland and joint waters of coastal rivers and their tributaries, and the Commission may delegate this authority to the Executive Director.
Each proclamation shall state the hour and date upon which it becomes effective, and shall be issued at least 48 hours prior to the effective date and time.
A permanent file of the text of all proclamations shall be maintained in the office of the Executive Director.
Certified copies of proclamations are entitled to judicial notice in any civil or criminal proceeding.The Executive Director shall make reasonable effort to give notice of the terms of any proclamation to persons who may be affected by it.
This effort shall include press releases to communications media, posting of notices at boating access areas and other places where persons affected may gather, personal communication by agents of the Wildlife Resources Commission, and other measures designed to reach persons who may be affected.
Proclamations under this subsection shall remain in force until rescinded following the same procedure established for enactment.

The Wildlife Resources Commission is authorized to authorize, license, regulate, prohibit, prescribe, or restrict anywhere in the State the acquisition, importation, possession, transportation, disposition, or release into public or private waters or the environment of zoological or botanical species or specimens that may threaten the introduction of epizootic disease or may create a danger to or an imbalance in the environment inimical to the conservation of wildlife resources. This subsection is not intended to give the Wildlife Resources Commission the authority to supplant, enact any conflicting rules, or otherwise take any action inconsistent with that of any other State agency acting within its jurisdiction.

It is unlawful for any person to:

Release or place exotic species of wild animals or wild birds in an area for the purpose of stocking the area for hunting or trapping;

Release or place species of wild animals or wild birds not indigenous to that area in an area for the purpose of stocking the area for hunting or trapping;

Take by hunting or trapping any animal or bird released or placed in an area in contravention of subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection, except under a permit to hunt or trap which may be issued by the Wildlife Resources Commission for the purpose of eradicating or controlling the population of any species of wildlife that has been so released or placed in the area.

History.

1965, c. 957, s. 2; 1973, c. 1262, s. 18; 1979, c. 830, s. 1; 1983, cc. 555, 615; 1987, c. 827, s. 98; 1991, c. 104, s. 1; c. 636, s. 8; 2003-344, s. 9.

§ 113-293.
Obstructing rivers or creeks; keeping open fishways in dams.

, (b) Repealed by Session Laws 1979, c. 830, s. 1.

(c)

It is unlawful for any person in inland fishing waters:

To set a net of any description across the main channel of any river or creek;

To erect so as to extend more than three fourths of the distance across any river or creek any stand, dam, weir, hedge, or other obstruction to the passage of fish;

To erect any stand, dam, weir, or hedge in any part of a river or creek required to be left open for the passage of fish; or,

Having erected any dam where the same was allowed, to fail to make and keep open such slope or fishway as may be required by law to be kept open for the free passage of fish.The provisions of this section may not be construed to conflict in any way with the laws and rules of any other agency with jurisdiction over the activity or subject matter in question.

History.

Code, ss. 3387-3389; Rev., s. 2457; 1909, c. 466, s. 1; 1915, c. 84, s. 21; 1917, c. 290, s. 7; C.S., ss. 1878, 1974; 1925, c. 168, s. 2; 1935, c. 35; 1945, c. 776; 1951, c. 1045, s. 1; 1953, cc. 774, 1251; 1963, c. 1097, s. 1; 1965, c. 957, s. 2; 1973, c. 1262, s. 18; 1979, c. 830, s. 1; 1987, c. 827, s. 98.

§ 113-294.
Specific violations.

Any person who unlawfully sells, possesses for sale, or buys any wildlife is guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00), unless a greater penalty is prescribed for the offense in question.

Any person who unlawfully sells, possesses for sale, or buys any deer or wild turkey is guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500.00) in addition to such other punishment prescribed for the offense in question.

Any person who unlawfully takes, possesses, or transports any wild turkey is guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) in addition to such other punishment prescribed for the offense in question.

(c1)

Any person who unlawfully takes, possesses, transports, sells, possesses for sale, or buys any bear or bear part is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not less than two thousand dollars ($2,000) in addition to such other punishment prescribed for the offense in question. Each of the acts specified shall constitute a separate offense.

(c2)

Any person who unlawfully takes, possesses, transports, sells, possesses for sale, or buys any cougar (Felis concolor) is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor, unless a greater penalty is prescribed for the offense in question.

(c3)

Any person who unlawfully takes, possesses, or transports any elk is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not less than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) in addition to such other punishment prescribed for the offense in question.

Any person who unlawfully takes, possesses, or transports any deer is guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) in addition to such other punishment prescribed for the offense in question.

(d1)

Any person who unlawfully takes, possesses, or transports any deer from land that has been posted in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 14-159.7

without written permission of the landowner, lessee, or the agent of the landowner or lessee is guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500.00).

Any person who unlawfully takes deer between a half hour after sunset and a half hour before sunrise with the aid of an artificial light is guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500.00) in addition to such other punishment prescribed for the offense in question.

Any person who unlawfully takes, possesses, transports, sells, or buys any beaver, or violates any rule of the Wildlife Resources Commission adopted to protect beavers, is guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor, unless a greater penalty is prescribed for the offense in question.

Any person who unlawfully takes wild animals or birds from or with the use of a vessel equipped with a motor or with motor attached is guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor, unless a greater penalty is prescribed for the offense in question.

Any person who willfully makes any false or misleading statement in order to secure for himself or another any license, permit, privilege, exemption, or other benefit under this Subchapter to which he or the person in question is not entitled is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

Any person who violates any provision of

G.S. 113-291.6

, regulating trapping, is guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor, unless a greater penalty is prescribed for the offense in question.

Any person who unlawfully sells, possesses for sale, or buys a fox, or who takes any fox by unlawful trapping or with the aid of any electronic calling device is guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor, unless a greater penalty is prescribed for the offense in question.

Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 209, s. 1.

Any person who unlawfully takes, possesses, transports, sells or buys any bald eagle or golden eagle, alive or dead, or any part, nest or egg of a bald eagle or golden eagle is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor, unless a greater penalty is prescribed for the offense in question.

Any person who unlawfully takes any migratory game bird with a rifle; or who unlawfully takes any migratory game bird with the aid of live decoys or any salt, grain, fruit, or other bait; or who unlawfully takes any migratory game bird during the closed season or during prohibited shooting hours; or who unlawfully exceeds the bag limits or possession limits applicable to any migratory game bird; or who violates any of the migratory game bird permit or tagging rules of the Wildlife Resources Commission is guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) in addition to any other punishment prescribed for the offense in question.

Any person who violates any rule of the Commission that restricts access by vehicle on game lands to a person who holds a special vehicular access identification card and permit issued by the Commission to persons who have a handicap that limits physical mobility shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor and shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) in addition to any other punishment prescribed for the offense.

Any person who willfully transports or attempts to transport live coyotes (Cania latrans) into this State for any purpose, or who breeds coyotes for any purpose in this State, is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor, and upon conviction the Wildlife Resources Commission shall suspend any controlled hunting preserve operator license issued to that person for two years.

Any person who willfully imports or possesses black-tailed or mule deer (Odocoileus hemionus and all subspecies) in this State for any purpose is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

Any person who violates any provision of

G.S. 113-291.1

A is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

It is unlawful to place processed food products as bait in any area of the State where the Wildlife Resources Commission has set an open season for taking black bears. For purposes of this subsection, the term “processed food products” means any food substance or flavoring that has been modified from its raw components by the addition of ingredients or by treatment to modify its chemical composition or form or to enhance its aroma or taste. The term includes substances modified by sugar, honey, syrups, oils, salts, spices, peanut butter, grease, meat, bones, or blood, as well as extracts of such substances. The term also includes sugary products such as candies, pastries, gums, and sugar blocks, as well as extracts of such products. Nothing in this subsection prohibits the lawful disposal of solid waste or the legitimate feeding of domestic animals, livestock, or birds. The prohibition against taking bears with the use and aid of bait shall not apply to the release of dogs in the vicinity of any food source that is not a processed food product as defined herein. Violation of this subsection constitutes a Class 2 misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00).

Any person who violates the provisions of

G.S. 113-291.12

by unlawfully removing feral swine from a trap while the swine is still alive or by transporting such swine after that removal is guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00). The acts of removal from a trap and of transporting the swine after removal shall constitute separate offenses.

History.

1935, c. 486, s. 25; 1939, c. 235, s. 2; c. 269; 1941, c. 231, s. 2; c. 288; 1945, c. 635; 1949, c. 1205, s. 4; 1953, c. 1141; 1963, c. 147; c. 697, ss. 2, 31/2; 1965, c. 616; 1967, c. 729; c. 1149, s. 1; 1971, c. 423, s. 1; c. 524; c. 899, s. 2; 1973, c. 677; 1975, c. 216; 1977, c. 705, s. 4; c. 794, s. 2; c. 933, s. 8; 1979, c. 830, s. 1; 1985, c. 306; c. 554, s. 3; 1987, c. 452, s. 4; c. 827, s. 98; 1989, c. 327, s. 2; 1991, c. 366, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 863; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1995, c. 209, ss. 1, 2; 2003-96, s. 2; 2003-344, s. 10; 2005-62, s. 2; 2007-96, s. 1; 2011-369, s. 6(b); 2013-380, s. 11.

§ 113-294.1.
Wildlife Poacher Reward Fund.

There is established in the Office of the State Treasurer the Wildlife Poacher Reward Fund. Monies in the Fund shall be used to pay rewards to persons who provide information to the Wildlife Resources Commission or to law enforcement authorities that results in the arrest and conviction of persons who have committed criminal offenses involving the taking, injury, removal, damage, or destruction of wildlife resources. The Wildlife Resources Commission shall adopt rules for the administration of the Fund for these purposes.

The assets of the Wildlife Poacher Reward Fund shall be derived from the following:

A percentage of the compensation paid annually to the Commission as special conditions of offenders’ probation in criminal cases involving the taking, injury, removal, damage, or destruction of wildlife pursuant to G.S. 15A-1343(b1)(5), to be set by the Commission at not less than ten percent (10%) of those amounts paid as replacement costs and investigative costs.

All amounts paid to the Commission under G.S. 15A-1343(b1)(5) as compensation for rewards paid from the Fund.

The proceeds of any gifts, grants, and contributions to the State which are specifically designated for inclusion in the Fund.

Any other sources specified by law.

History.

2013-380, s. 1.

§ 113-295.
Unlawful harassment of persons taking wildlife resources.

It is unlawful for a person to interfere intentionally with the lawful taking of wildlife resources or to drive, harass, or intentionally disturb any wildlife resources for the purpose of disrupting the lawful taking of wildlife resources. It is unlawful to take or abuse property, equipment, or hunting dogs that are being used for the lawful taking of wildlife resources. This subsection does not apply to a person who incidentally interferes with the taking of wildlife resources while using the land for other lawful activity such as agriculture, mining, or recreation. This subsection also does not apply to activity by a person on land he owns or leases.Violation of this subsection is a Class 2 misdemeanor for a first conviction and a Class 1 misdemeanor for a second or subsequent conviction.

(a1)

It is unlawful to use an unmanned aircraft system, as defined in

G.S. 15A-300.1

, to violate subsection (a) of this section. Violation of this subsection is a Class 1 misdemeanor.

(a2)

It is unlawful for a person to place bait for the purpose of intentionally interfering with the lawful taking of wildlife. Violation of this subsection is a Class 2 misdemeanor for a first conviction and a Class 1 misdemeanor for a second or subsequent conviction.

The Wildlife Resources Commission may, either before or after the institution of any other action or proceeding authorized by this section, institute a civil action for injunctive relief to restrain a violation or threatened violation of subsection (a) of this section pursuant to

G.S. 113-131

. The action shall be brought in the superior court of the county in which the violation or threatened violation is occurring or about to occur and shall be in the name of the State upon the relation of the Wildlife Resources Commission. The court, in issuing any final order in any action brought pursuant to this subsection may, in its discretion, award costs of litigation including reasonable attorney and expert-witness fees to any party.

History.

1987, c. 636, s. 3; 1993, c. 539, s. 864; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2014-100, s. 34.30(f); 2021-160, s. 9A(a).